Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3265.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-3-18 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration
of Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-18. Display of plates — Penalties.
(a) Registration plates issued for a motor vehicle other than a motorcycle, trailer,
transporter vehicle, in-transit vehicle, or a bailee engaged in a business as defined in § 31-1-17(a),
or other than a motor vehicle owned by a duly authorized dealer in motor vehicles and which is
used in the dealer’s business shall be attached thereto one in the front and the other in the rear. The
registration plate issued for a motorcycle, trailer, bailee, or a dealer’s motor vehicle as defined in
this subsection shall be attached to the rear of the vehicle.
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, any motor vehicle that, as
manufactured and delivered for sale, is not equipped with a manufacturer-provided front
registration plate bracket, mounting point, or other manufacturer-provided means or location
intended for the attachment and display of a front registration plate, shall not be required to display
a front registration plate, and shall be in compliance with this section if:
(i) One registration plate issued in accordance with § 31-3-10 is properly attached to the
rear of the vehicle; and
(ii) The second registration plate issued in accordance with § 31-3-10 is carried within the
vehicle and displayed by the driver upon demand of a duly sworn law enforcement officer.
(b) Every registration plate shall at all times be securely fastened in a horizontal position

to the vehicle for which it is issued so as to prevent the plate from swinging at a height of not less
than twelve inches (12") from the ground, measuring from the bottom of the plate; in a place and
position to be clearly visible and shall be maintained free from foreign materials and in a condition
to be clearly legible.
(c) Penalties. Any person who shall violate the provisions of this section shall be guilty of
a violation and subject to a fine as enumerated in § 31-41.1-4.
(d) All vehicles registered as passenger, commercial, trailer, motorcycle, suburban, farm,
combination, taxi, radio operator, camper, public, racer tow, jitney, and antique must have
displayed on them the registration plate(s) as described in § 31-3-11. This subsection does not apply
to those registrants in possession of an alternative design plate as described in § 31-3-60 or any
other specially authorized plate described in this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006388
========
LC006388 - Page 2 of 3